Wisconsin, session 2025, AB851.
do enact as follows:AB851,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB851,29Section 2. 20.115 (7) (br) of the statutes is created to read:AB851,3,21020.115 (7) (br) Principal repayment and interest; agricultural conservation 11easements. A sum sufficient to reimburse s. 20.866 (1) (u) for the principal and 12interest costs incurred in purchasing agricultural conservation easements under s. 1393.73, to make the payments determined by the building commission under s. 1413.488 (1) (m) that are attributable to the proceeds of obligations incurred to 15purchase agricultural conservation easements under s. 93.73, and to make 1payments under an agreement or ancillary arrangement entered into under s. 218.06 (8) (a).AB851,33Section 3. 20.115 (7) (tb) of the statutes is created to read:AB851,3,11420.115 (7) (tb) Principal and interest; agricultural conservation easements. 5From the working lands fund, the amounts in the schedule to reimburse s. 20.866 6(1) (u) for the principal and interest costs incurred in purchasing agricultural 7conservation easements under s. 93.73, to make the payments determined by the 8building commission under s. 13.488 (1) (m) that are attributable to the proceeds of 9obligations incurred to purchase agricultural conservation easements under s. 1093.73, and to make payments under an agreement or ancillary agreement entered 11into under s. 18.06 (8) (a).AB851,412Section 4. 20.866 (1) (u) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1315, is amended to read:AB851,4,31420.866 (1) (u) Principal repayment and interest. A sum sufficient from 15moneys appropriated under sub. (2) (zp) and ss. 20.115 (2) (d) and (7) (b) and, (br), 16(s), and (tb), 20.190 (1) (c), (d), (i), and (j), 20.225 (1) (c) and (i), 20.245 (1) (e) and (j), 1720.250 (1) (c) and (e), 20.255 (1) (d), 20.285 (1) (d), (gj), and (je), 20.320 (1) (c) and (t) 18and (2) (c), 20.370 (7) (aa), (ad), (ag), (aq), (ar), (at), (au), (bq), (br), (cb), (cc), (cd), 19(cg), (cq), (cr), (cs), (ct), (ea), (eq), and (er), 20.395 (6) (af), (aq), (ar), and (au), 20.410 20(1) (e), (ec), and (ko) and (3) (e) and (fm), 20.435 (2) (ee), 20.465 (1) (d), 20.485 (1) (f) 21and (go) and (4) (qm), 20.505 (4) (es), (et), (ha), and (hb) and (5) (c), (g), and (kc), 2220.855 (8) (a), and 20.867 (1) (a) and (b) and (3) (a), (b), (bb), (bc), (bd), (be), (bf), (bg), 23(bh), (bj), (bL), (bm), (bn), (bo), (bq), (br), (bt), (bu), (bv), (bw), (bx), (cb), (cd), (cf), 24(ch), (cj), (cq), (cr), (cs), (cv), (cw), (cx), (cy), (cz), (g), (h), (i), (kd), and (q) for the 1payment of principal, interest, premium due, if any, and payment due, if any, under 2an agreement or ancillary arrangement entered into under s. 18.06 (8) (a) relating 3to any public debt contracted under subchs. I and IV of ch. 18.AB851,54Section 5. 20.866 (2) (wg) of the statutes is created to read:AB851,4,9520.866 (2) (wg) Agricultural conservation easements. From the capital 6improvement fund, a sum sufficient for the department of agriculture, trade and 7consumer protection to purchase agricultural conservation easements under s. 893.73. The state may contract public debt in an amount not to exceed $25,000,000 9for this purpose.AB851,610Section 6. 23.197 (15) of the statutes is repealed.AB851,711Section 7. 93.73 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB851,4,181293.73 (2) (b) The department, after consultation with the council under sub. 13(13), shall solicit applications under sub. (3) at least annually. The department 14shall issue each solicitation in writing and shall publish a notice announcing the 15solicitation. In soliciting applications, the department may specify the total 16amount of funds available, application deadlines, application requirements and 17procedures, preliminary criteria for evaluating applications, and other relevant 18information.AB851,4,1919